Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 1. The Department and the Commissioner.
§ 37.2-311.1.
Comprehensive crisis system; Marcus alert system; powers and duties of the Department related to comprehensive mental health, substance abuse, and developmental disability crisis services.

As used in this section and §§

37.2-311.2

through

37.2-311.6

, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Community care team”
means a team of mental health service providers, and may include registered peer recovery specialists and law-enforcement officers as a team, with the mental health service providers leading such team, to help stabilize individuals in crisis situations. Law enforcement may provide backup support as needed to a community care team in accordance with the protocols and best practices developed pursuant to §

9.1-193

. In addition to serving as a co-response unit, community care teams may, at the discretion of the employing locality, engage in community mental health awareness and services.

“Comprehensive crisis system”
means the continuum of care established by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services pursuant to this section.

“Crisis call center”
means a call center that provides crisis intervention that meets NSPL standards for risk assessment and engagement and the requirements of §

37.2-311.2

.

“Crisis stabilization center”
means a facility providing short-term (under 24 hours) observation and crisis stabilization services to all referrals in a home-like, nonhospital environment.

“Fund”
means the Crisis Call Center Fund established under §

37.2-311.4

.

“Historically economically disadvantaged community”
means the same as that term is defined in § 56-576.

“Mental health awareness response and community understanding services alert system”
or

“Marcus alert system”

means a set of protocols to (i) initiate a behavioral health response to a behavioral health crisis, including for individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis secondary to mental illness, substance abuse, developmental disabilities, or any combination thereof; (ii) divert such individuals to the behavioral health or developmental services system whenever feasible; and (iii) facilitate a specialized response in accordance with §

9.1-193

when diversion is not feasible.

“Mobile crisis response”
means the provision of professional, same-day intervention for children or adults who are experiencing crises and whose behaviors are consistent with mental illness or substance abuse, or both, including individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis that is secondary to mental illness, substance abuse, developmental or intellectual disability, brain injury, or any combination thereof. “Mobile crisis response” may be provided by a community care team or a mobile crisis team, and a locality may establish either or both types of teams to best meet its needs.

“Mobile crisis team”
means a team of one or more qualified or licensed mental health professionals and may include a registered peer recovery specialist or a family support partner. A law-enforcement officer shall not be a member of a mobile crisis team, but law enforcement may provide backup support as needed to a mobile crisis team in accordance with the protocols and best practices developed pursuant to § 9.1-193.

“NSPL”
or

“National Suicide Prevention Lifeline”

means the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline established by the federal government in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 290bb—36c to provide a national network of crisis centers linked by a toll-free number to route callers in suicidal crisis or emotional distress to the closest certified local crisis center.

“NSPL Administrator”
means the entity designated by the federal government to administer the NSPL.

“Registered peer recovery specialist”
means the same as such term is defined in §

54.1-3500

.

“SAMHSA”
or

“Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration”

means the agency within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services that leads federal behavioral health efforts.

The Department shall have the following duties and responsibilities for the provision of crisis services and support for individuals with mental illness, substance abuse, developmental or intellectual disabilities, or brain injury who are experiencing a crisis related to mental health, substance abuse, or behavioral support needs:

The Department shall develop a comprehensive crisis system, with such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose, based on national best practice models and composed of a crisis call center, community care and mobile crisis teams, crisis stabilization centers, and the Marcus alert system. In addition to all requirements under this section, the crisis call center shall meet the requirements of §

37.2-311.2

.

By July 1, 2021, the Department, in collaboration with the Department of Criminal Justice Services and law-enforcement, mental health, behavioral health, developmental services, emergency management, brain injury, and racial equity stakeholders, shall develop a written plan for the development of a Marcus alert system. Such plan shall (i) inventory past and current crisis intervention teams established pursuant to Article 13 (§

9.1-187

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1 throughout the Commonwealth that have received state funding; (ii) inventory the existence, status, and experiences of community services board mobile crisis teams and crisis stabilization units; (iii) identify any other existing cooperative relationships between community services boards and law-enforcement agencies; (iv) review the prevalence of crisis situations involving mental illness or substance abuse, or both, including individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis that is secondary to mental illness, substance abuse, developmental or intellectual disability, brain injury, or any combination thereof; (v) identify state and local funding of emergency and crisis services; (vi) include protocols to divert calls from the 9-1-1 dispatch and response system to a crisis call center for risk assessment and engagement, including assessment for mobile crisis or community care team dispatch; (vii) include protocols for local law-enforcement agencies to enter into memorandums of agreement with mobile crisis response providers regarding requests for law-enforcement backup during a mobile crisis or community care team response; (viii) develop minimum standards, best practices, and a system for the review and approval of protocols for law-enforcement participation in the Marcus alert system set forth in §

9.1-193

; (ix) assign specific responsibilities, duties, and authorities among responsible state and local entities; and (x) assess the effectiveness of a locality’s or area’s plan for community involvement, including engaging with and providing services to historically economically disadvantaged communities, training, and therapeutic response alternatives.

No later than December 1, 2021, the Department shall establish five Marcus alert programs and community care or mobile crisis teams, one located in each of the five Department regions.
C. 1. No later than December 1, 2021, the Department shall establish five Marcus alert programs and community care or mobile crisis teams, one located in each of the five Department regions.

No later than July 1, 2023, the Department shall establish five additional Marcus alert system programs and community care or mobile crisis teams, one located in each of the five Department regions. Community services boards or behavioral health authorities that serve the largest populations in each region, excluding those community services boards or behavioral health authorities already selected under subdivision 1, shall be selected for programs under this subdivision.

The Department shall establish additional Marcus alert systems and community care teams in geographical areas served by a community services board or behavioral health authority by July 1, 2024; July 1, 2025; and July 1, 2026. No later than July 1, 2028, all community services board and behavioral health authority geographical areas shall have established a Marcus alert system that uses a community care or mobile crisis team.

All community care teams and mobile crisis teams established under this section shall meet the standards set forth in §

37.2-311.3

.

The Department shall report annually by November 15 to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Committees for Courts of Justice and on Health, Welfare and Institutions, the Senate Committees on the Judiciary and Education and Health, and the Behavioral Health Commission regarding the comprehensive crisis system and the effectiveness of such system in meeting the goals set forth in this section. The report shall include, for the previous calendar year, (i) a description of approved local Marcus alert programs in the Commonwealth, including the number of such programs operating in the Commonwealth, the number of such programs added in the previous calendar year, and an analysis of how such programs work to connect the Commonwealth’s comprehensive crisis system and mobile crisis response programs; (ii) the number of calls received by the crisis call center established pursuant to this section; (iii) the number of mobile crisis responses undertaken by community care teams and mobile crisis teams in the Commonwealth; (iv) the number of mobile crisis responses that involved law-enforcement backup; (v) the number of crisis incidents and injuries to any parties involved; (vi) an analysis of the overall operation of any local protocols adopted or programs established pursuant to §

9.1-193

, including any disparities in response and outcomes by race and ethnicity of individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis and recommendations for improvement of the programs; (vii) a description of the overall function of the Marcus alert program and the comprehensive crisis system, including a description of any successes and any challenges encountered; and (viii) recommendations for improvement of the Marcus alert system and approved local Marcus alert programs. The report shall also include (a) a description of barriers to establishment of a local Marcus alert program and community care or mobile crisis team to provide mobile crisis response in each geographical area served by a community services board or behavioral health authority in which such program and team has not been established and (b) a plan for addressing such barriers in order to increase the number of local Marcus alert programs and community care or mobile crisis teams. The Department of Criminal Justice Services shall assist the Department in the preparation of the report required by this subsection.

History.

2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41, 42; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248; 2022, cc. 613, 619.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall coordinate a public service campaign to run from July 1, 2021, until January 1, 2022, announcing the development and establishment of community care teams and mental health awareness response and community understanding services (Marcus) alert systems in localities and areas throughout the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall be referred to as the Marcus-David Peters Act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 248, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “and §§

37.2-311.2

through

37.2-311.6

” in the introductory language, in the definition for “Crisis call center,” substituted “NSPL” for “National Suicide Prevention Lifeline” and added “and the requirements of §

37.2-311.2

”; inserted the definitions for “Fund,” “NSPL,” “Registered peer recovery specialist” and “SAMSHA”; added the second sentence in subdivision B 1; and added subdivision C 4.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 613 and 619 are identical, and substituted “2028” for “2026” in subdivision C 3; and rewrote subsection D, which read: “The Department shall assess and report on the impact and effectiveness of the comprehensive crisis system in meeting its goals. The assessment shall include the number of calls to the crisis call center, number of mobile crisis responses, number of crisis responses that involved law-enforcement backup, and overall function of the comprehensive crisis system. A portion of the report, focused on the function of the Marcus alert system and local protocols for law-enforcement participation in the Marcus alert system, shall be written in collaboration with the Department of Criminal Justice Services and shall include the number and description of approved local programs and how the programs interface comprehensive crisis system and mobile crisis response; the number of crisis incidents and injuries to any parties involved; a description of successes and problems encountered; and an analysis of the overall operation of any local protocols or programs, including any disparities in response and outcomes by race and ethnicity of individuals experiencing a behavioral health crisis and recommendations for improvement of the programs. The report shall also include a specific plan to phase in a Marcus alert system and mobile crisis response in each remaining geographical area served by a community services board or behavioral health authority as required in subdivision C 3. The Department, in collaboration with the Department of Criminal Justice Services, shall (i) submit a report by November 15, 2021, to the Joint Commission on Health Care outlining progress toward the assessment of these factors and any assessment items that are available for the reporting period and (ii) submit a comprehensive annual report to the Joint Commission on Health Care by November 15 of each subsequent year.”

Effective date.

This section is effective March 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-311.2.
Powers and duties of crisis call center.

The crisis call center established by the Department pursuant to §

37.2-311.1

shall provide crisis intervention services and crisis care coordination to individuals accessing the NSPL from any jurisdiction in the Commonwealth 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

In administering the crisis call center, the Department shall:

Apply for participation in and enter into an agreement with the NSPL Administrator for participation within the NSPL;

Meet NSPL requirements and best practices guidelines for operational and clinical standards;

Report, provide data, and participate in evaluations and related quality improvement activities as required by the NSPL Administrator;

Use technology, including chat and text, that is interoperable across crisis and emergency response systems used throughout the Commonwealth and that is consistent with any standards promulgated by the NSPL Administrator;

Deploy crisis and outgoing services, including mobile crisis teams and community care teams;

Coordinate access to the comprehensive crisis system or other local resources as appropriate and according to guidelines and best practices established by the NSPL Administrator;

Actively collaborate with local community service boards to coordinate linkages for persons contacting the NSPL with ongoing care needs;

Establish formal agreements with local community services boards as it deems appropriate;

Coordinate access to the comprehensive crisis system for individuals accessing the NSPL through appropriate information sharing regarding availability of services;

Work with the NSPL Administrator and VCL networks to establish consistency of public messaging about services provided by the NSPL;

Meet any requirements set forth by the NSPL Administrator for serving high-risk and specialized populations as identified by SAMHSA, including any policies and training requirements for providing linguistically and cultural competent care and, if appropriate, transferring such callers to an appropriate specialized center or subnetwork within or external to the NSPL network;

Provide follow-up services to individuals who access the NSPL consistent with guidance and policies established by the NSPL;

Report any information required by the U.S. Federal Communications Commission, including information regarding the collection and expenditure by the Commonwealth of state and federal funds for the purposes of administering the call center, and regarding the use of the NSPL through the crisis call center;

Establish any work group or task force as necessary to administer the provisions of this section and §§

37.2-311.1

and

37.2-311.3

; and

Comply with any applicable requirements, including associated deadlines, of the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020, P.L. 116-172.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-311.3.
Standards for community care teams and mobile crisis teams.

The Department shall ensure that mobile crisis teams and community care teams:

Are designed in partnership with community members, including people with lived experience utilizing crisis services;

Are staffed by personnel who reflect the demographics of the community served;

To the extent permitted by law, collect customer service data from individuals served, including demographic information and any information recommended by SAMHSA; and

Collaborate with local law-enforcement agencies in use of the crisis call center.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-311.4.
Crisis Call Center Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Crisis Call Center Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All revenues accruing to the Fund pursuant to §

37.2-311.5

, all funds appropriated to the Fund, and any gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds received on the Fund’s behalf shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of establishing and administering the crisis call center pursuant to the provisions of §§

37.2-311.1

,

37.2-311.2

, and

37.2-311.3

. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-311.5.
Collection of 988 charges.

Each dealer, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, shall collect a prepaid wireless 988 charge of $0.08 from the end user, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, with respect to each retail transaction, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, occurring in the Commonwealth. A dealer may combine the tax imposed by this subdivision and the prepaid wireless E-911 charge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17:1 into a combined charge collected on a retail transaction and remitted to the Department of Taxation. If the dealer elects to combine the charges, the combined charge shall be identified as “911/988 Charge” on the invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the end user by the dealer or otherwise disclosed by the dealer to the end user. If a dealer collects a combined charge, the dealer shall report to the Department of Taxation, pursuant to forms and procedures prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, the respective amounts that are attributable to the prepaid wireless 988 charge imposed under this subdivision and the prepaid wireless E-911 charge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17:1.
A. 1. Each dealer, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, shall collect a prepaid wireless 988 charge of $0.08 from the end user, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, with respect to each retail transaction, as defined in § 56-484.17:1, occurring in the Commonwealth. A dealer may combine the tax imposed by this subdivision and the prepaid wireless E-911 charge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17:1 into a combined charge collected on a retail transaction and remitted to the Department of Taxation. If the dealer elects to combine the charges, the combined charge shall be identified as “911/988 Charge” on the invoice, receipt, or other similar document that is provided to the end user by the dealer or otherwise disclosed by the dealer to the end user. If a dealer collects a combined charge, the dealer shall report to the Department of Taxation, pursuant to forms and procedures prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, the respective amounts that are attributable to the prepaid wireless 988 charge imposed under this subdivision and the prepaid wireless E-911 charge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17:1.

Each CMRS provider, as defined in § 56-484.12, and each reseller of CMRS, as defined in § 56-484.12, shall collect a monthly postpaid wireless 988 charge of $0.12 from each of its customers whose place of primary use, as defined in § 56-484.12, is within the Commonwealth. The charge shall be billed with respect to customers of postpaid CMRS, as defined in § 56-484.12, by each CMRS provider and reseller of CMRS on each CMRS device capable of two-way interactive voice communication. A CMRS provider or reseller of CMRS may combine the tax imposed by this subdivision and the monthly wireless E-911 surcharge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17 into a combined charge to be collected from the customer. If a CMRS provider or reseller of CMRS elects to combine the charges, the combined charge shall be identified to the customer as the “911/988 Charge” through regular periodic billing. If a CMRS provider or reseller of CMRS collects a combined charge, such CMRS provider of reseller of CMRS shall report to the Department of Taxation, pursuant to forms and procedures prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, the respective amounts that are attributable to the monthly postpaid wireless 988 charge imposed under this subdivision and the monthly wireless E-911 surcharge imposed by subsection B of § 56-484.17.

The charges imposed under this section shall be collected by the Department of Taxation and shall be subject to the provisions of Article 7 (§ 56-484.12 et seq.) of Chapter 15 of Title 56, mutatis mutandis, except that all revenues from the prepaid wireless 988 charge imposed under subdivision A 1 and from the monthly postpaid wireless 988 charge imposed under subdivision A 2 shall accrue to the Fund and shall be used for the purposes identified in §

37.2-311.4

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-311.6.
Liability for emergency calls to the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline.

Any originating service provider, as defined in § 56-484.12, and its employees and agents shall not be liable to any person for damages incurred as a result of any act or omission by it, except gross negligence or intentional, willful, or wanton misconduct, in connection with an emergency call, as defined in § 56-484.19, to the NSPL or the crisis call center.

Any originating service provider, as defined in § 56-484.12 and its employees and agents shall not be liable to any person for damages incurred as a result of any release of information not in the public record to the NSPL, to the crisis call center, to any employee or agent of the NSPL or the crisis call center, or to emergency responders, as defined in § 56-484.19, if such release of information occurred in connection with an emergency call, as defined in § 56-484.19 to the NSPL or the crisis call center.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 248.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 37.2-312.
Department responsible for education and training programs.

The Department shall be responsible for providing for education and training of school-age individuals in state facilities. The Board of Education shall supervise the education and training provided to school-age individuals in training centers, and shall provide for and direct the education for school-age individuals in state hospitals in cooperation with the Department. In discharging this responsibility, the Department shall exercise leadership by: (i) coordinating actions with the Department of Education and state facilities to ensure consistency between treatment and educational priorities in the policy and implementation of direct services for school-age individuals in state facilities; (ii) ensuring that comparable resources especially in career and technical education, appropriate to the students’ disabilities and needs, are available in all state facilities; (iii) monitoring the quality of the instruction provided to all school-age individuals in state facilities; (iv) requiring state facility directors to evaluate the performance of the education directors pursuant to guidelines developed in cooperation with the Board of Education; (v) developing and implementing, in cooperation with the Department of Education, programs to ensure that the educational and treatment needs of children with dual diagnoses in state facilities are met; (vi) taking an active role with the Department of Education to evaluate the effectiveness of prevalent educational models in state facilities; and (vii) designing a mechanism for maintaining constant direct contact and the sharing of ideas, approaches, and innovations between the education directors and teachers whether they are employees of local school divisions or of the Commonwealth who are educating school-age individuals in state facilities.

History.

1985, c. 207, § 37.1-10.01; 2001, c. 483; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 2, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any local school board to rename its vocational schools or programs or to require any public or private vocational school to change its name; however, any public school having in its name the terms vocational or vocational technical or any variation of these terms and designated by a local school board to be a vocational or vocational technical school shall comply with the relevant requirements for career and technical education set forth in Title 22.1 of the Code of Virginia and the applicable regulations.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 3, provides: “That nothing contained in this act shall be construed to require expenditure of funds to realign any name with the term “career and technical education” or to require any redesigning or reprinting of any logo, stationery, informational material or website. In addition, any stationery, pamphlets or other printed material referring to vocational education or some other term denoting career and technical education requiring an eventual revision of a state program or name may continue to be used in the normal course of business until consumed before being redesigned and reprinted.”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides: “That, further, whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term ‘career and technical education.’ ”

Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 5, provides: “That this act shall not be construed to require any additional services or changes in services in any state or local program or to require any such program to deliver different services than are required by applicable law.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals” for “consumers” throughout the section.

§ 37.2-312.1.
Department to be lead agency for suicide prevention across the lifespan.

With such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose, the Department, in consultation with community services boards and behavioral health authorities, the Department of Health, local departments of health, and the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, shall have the lead responsibility for the suicide prevention across the lifespan program. The Department shall coordinate the activities of the agencies of the Commonwealth pertaining to suicide prevention in order to develop and carry out a comprehensive suicide prevention plan addressing public awareness, the promotion of health development, early identification, intervention and treatment, and support to survivors. The Department shall cooperate with federal, state, and local agencies, private and public agencies, survivor groups, and other interested persons to prevent suicide.

The Commissioner shall report annually by December 1 to the Governor and the General Assembly on the Department’s activities related to suicide prevention across the lifespan.

History.

2005, cc. 336, 434, 716, § 37.1-24.001; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2018, c. 370.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 336 and 434, enacted former § 37.1-24.001. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, c. 5, the 2005 enactment by cc. 336 and 434, has been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2017, c. 464 provides: § 1. “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall report by December 1, 2017, to the Governor and the General Assembly on its activities related to suicide prevention across the lifespan pursuant to §

37.2-312.1

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and substituted “Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department for the Aging” in the first sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 370 added subsection B and made related changes.

§ 37.2-312.2.
Commonwealth Mental Health First Aid Program.

For the purposes of this section, “certified trainer” means a person who has successfully completed a Mental Health First Aid instructor training program offered by the national authorities of Mental Health First Aid USA or the Commonwealth Mental Health First Aid Program and obtained a certification as an instructor of Mental Health First Aid.

The Department shall establish and administer the Commonwealth Mental Health First Aid Program (the Program) to provide training by certified trainers of individuals residing or working in the Commonwealth on how to identify and assist individuals who have or may be developing a mental health or substance use disorder or who may be experiencing a mental health or substance abuse crisis. Such program shall include training on:

Building mental health and substance abuse literacy designed to help the public identify, understand, and respond to the signs of mental illness and substance abuse;

Assisting individuals who have or may be developing a mental health or substance use disorder or who may be experiencing a mental health or substance abuse crisis by (i) recognizing the symptoms of a mental health or substance use disorder; (ii) providing initial assistance to those experiencing a mental health crisis; (iii) guiding individuals requiring assistance, including individuals who may be experiencing a mental health or substance abuse crisis, toward appropriate professional assistance; (iv) providing comfort to an individual experiencing a mental health or substance abuse crisis; (v) helping an individual with a mental health or substance use disorder avoid a mental health or substance abuse crisis that may lead to more costly interventions and treatments; and (vi) promoting healing, recovery, and good mental health.

The Department shall ensure that evaluative criteria are established to measure the effectiveness of the Program, including fidelity of the Program and training provided thereunder to the objectives set forth in subsection B.

Neither the Department nor any other agency of the Commonwealth shall incur any liability by reason of (i) any action taken by an employer or other person on the basis of information or materials provided through the Program or (ii) any workplace violence that occurs, regardless of whether the workplace at which an episode of workplace violence occurs had received information or materials provided through the Program.

History.

2016, c. 407.

Cross references.

As to mental health awareness training for public school personnel, see § 22.1-298.6.

§ 37.2-313.
Employment of unlicensed physician by Department.

Unless a physician is licensed by the Commonwealth or is in an internship or residency program approved by the Commissioner, he shall not be employed by the Department for the practice of any of the healing arts or to provide services under the supervision of the Commissioner.

History.

1974, c. 661, § 37.1-20.1; 1976, c. 671; 1980, c. 582; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-313.1.
Licensed physician required at certain training centers.

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall require a licensed physician to be on duty at all times for any certified skilled nursing beds in any state training center as defined in §

37.2-100

.

History.

2010, c. 355.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Acts 2010, c. 355, has been codified as §

37.2-313.1

.